Nevada, session 83, SB30.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 213.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.020 1. Any person intending to apply to have a fine or
forfeiture remitted, a punishment commuted, a pardon granted or his
or her civil rights restored, or any person acting on his or her behalf,
must submit an application to the Board, in accordance with the
procedures established by the Secretary pursuant to NRS 213.017,
specifying therein:
(a) The court in which the judgment was rendered;
(b) The amount of the fine or forfeiture, or the kind or character
of punishment;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) The name of the person in whose favor the application is to
be made;
(d) The particular grounds upon which the application will be
based; and
(e) Any other information deemed relevant by the Secretary.
2. A person must not be required to pay a fee to have a fine or
forfeiture remitted, a punishment commuted, a pardon granted or his
or her civil rights restored pursuant to this section.
3. Except as otherwise provided in a policy adopted pursuant to
NRS 213.035, the Secretary shall submit notice of the date, time and
location of the meeting to consider the application and one copy of
the application to the district attorney [and to the district judge] of
the county wherein the person was convicted. In cases of fines and
forfeitures, notice of the date, time and location of the meeting to
consider the application must also be served on the chair of the
board of county commissioners of the county wherein the person
was convicted.
4. Except as otherwise provided in a policy adopted pursuant to
NRS 213.035, notice of the date, time and location of a meeting to
consider an application pursuant to this section must be served upon
the appropriate persons as required in this section at least 30 days
before the presentation of the application, unless a member of the
Board, for good cause, prescribes a shorter time.
5. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a
district judge from providing factual and non-character testimony
regarding the release or detention of a prisoner in response to a
subpoena or other formal request from the Board.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 213.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.035 The Board may adopt a policy to provide an expedited
process to take action, without holding a meeting, to restore the civil
rights, in whole or in part, of a person who submits an application to
the Board to have his or her civil rights restored if certain conditions
are met, including, without limitation, that:
1. [There is no objection from the court in which the judgment
was rendered;
2.] There is no objection from the district attorney of the
county wherein the person was convicted; and
[3.] 2. The Board has not received a written request for notice
concerning a meeting to consider an application for clemency from
a victim of a crime committed by the person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 1.7. NRS 213.10887 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
213.10887 1. The Board shall compile and maintain detailed
information concerning all decisions regarding parole. The
information must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The Board’s reasons for each decision to grant, deny, revoke
or continue parole.
(b) The number of decisions made by the Board granting parole,
denying parole, revoking parole and continuing parole.
2. The Board shall:
(a) Organize and tabulate the information compiled pursuant to
this section at regular intervals, which must not exceed 3 months;
[and]
(b) Publish such information on its Internet website [.] ; and
(c) Upon request, disseminate records of decisions regarding
parole to any person who requests such a record of a named
prisoner, excluding any personal identifying information, after the
prisoner and any victims have been notified of the decision.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)